Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-885.40
Subdivision real estate; failure to comply with sections; contract void; repayment of money with interest.

Failure on the part of any person, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation to comply with sections 81-885.33 to 81-885.39 shall render any contract (1) entered into in this state or (2) arising out of contacts between the purchaser and subdivider within this state void and unenforceable, and any money paid under such contract to the subdivider, together with interest at the rate of six percent per annum from date of such payment, may be recovered in an action at law brought in the county where the cause of action or some part thereof arose.

Laws 1973, LB 68, § 40;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 536;

Laws 2002, LB 863, § 23.